Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

General

48-246-101. Governing law.

Subject to the Constitution of Tennessee:

The laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign LLC is formed or organized govern its formation or organization and internal affairs and the liability of its members and representatives, regardless of whether the foreign LLC procured or should have procured a certificate of authority under this chapter; and

Except as provided in § 48-248-501, a foreign LLC may not be denied a certificate of authority to transact business in this state by reason of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization and the laws of this state.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-246-102. Activities not constituting transacting business.

The following activities of a foreign LLC, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of this chapter or § 48-247-110:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding, claim, or dispute;

Holding meetings of its members or representatives or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign LLC's own securities or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through representatives or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, deeds of trust, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages, deeds of trust, and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property; provided, that for a reasonable time the management and rental of real property acquired in connection with enforcing a mortgage or deed of trust shall also not be considered transacting business if the owner is attempting to liquidate the investment and if no office or other agency therefor, other than an independent agency, is maintained in this state;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within one (1) month and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature; or

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

An organization formed or organized under the laws of any foreign jurisdiction or the laws of any jurisdiction other than the state of Tennessee shall not be deemed to be doing business in Tennessee for purposes of obtaining a certificate of authority to do business solely by reason of its being or acting in its capacity as a member of a foreign or domestic LLC.

The list of activities in subsection (a) is not exhaustive, and is applicable solely to determine whether a foreign LLC must procure a certificate of authority and for no other purpose. This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign LLC or its members to service of process or taxation in this state or to regulation under any other law of this state.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 82.